District of Columbia statutes.
31-1372.11

Policy loans.

A life insurer may lend to a policyholder on the security of the cash surrender value of the policyholder’s policy a sum not exceeding the legal reserve that the insurer is required to maintain on the policy.

Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 211, 50 DCR 330
This section is referenced in § 31-1371.06.